Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3702
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Court Appointed Special Advocate Act, the definitions in sections 43-3703 to 43-3705 apply.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 25.